apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>out<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="dig/eriñ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eriñ</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oret</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oran</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orez</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oromp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orit</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oront</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orer</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oren</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ores</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oremp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orec’h</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orent</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ored</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oris</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjout</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oras</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjomp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjoc’h</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjont</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjod</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orin</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ori</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oro</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orimp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orot</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oroc’h</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orint</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oror</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfen</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfes</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfe</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfemp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfec’h</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfent</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orfed</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjen</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjes</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orje</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjemp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjec’h</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjent</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orjed</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oret</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oromp</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orit</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orent</l>
          <r>eriñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	

    <e lm="digeriñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ig</i><par n="dig/eriñ__vblex"/></e>
